Maryland, session 2026, HB0316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
4–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) (1) “Medical record” means any oral, written, or other transmission in any
form or medium of information that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0316*

HOUSE BILL 316
(i) Is [entered in the record of a patient or recipient] RECORDED
BY A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER THROUGH WRITTEN, ELECTRONIC, OR OTHER MEANS,
INCLUDING AUDIO OR VIDEO MEANS;
(ii) Identifies or can readily be associated with the identity of a
patient or recipient; and
(iii) Relates to the health care of the patient or recipient.
(2) “Medical record” includes any:
(i) Documentation of disclosures of a medical record to any person
who is not an employee, agent, or consultant of the health care provider;
(ii) File or record maintained under § 12–403(c)(13) of the Health
Occupations Article by a pharmacy of a prescription order for drugs, medicines, or devices
that identifies or may be readily associated with the identity of a patient;
(iii) Documentation of an examination of a patient regardless of who:
1. Requested the examination; or
2. Is making payment for the examination; [and]
(iv) File or record received from another health care provider that:
1. Relates to the health care of a patient or recipient received
from that health care provider; and
2. Identifies or can readily be associated with the identity of
the patient or recipient; AND
(V) ELECTRONIC MESSAGE SENT OR RECEIVED BY A HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER THAT IDENTIFIES OR MAY READILY BE ASSOCIATED WITH THE
IDENTITY OF A PATIENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.